Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5442.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-35-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-35 entitled "Public
Utilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-35-18. Bomb threats and similar false reports.
(a) Whoever, knowing the report to be false, transmits or causes to be transmitted to any
person by telephone or other means a communication falsely reporting, warning, or threatening
either the location existence of any explosive or other dangerous substance or contrivance, or a
shooting or other dangerous event or happening, at a location, causing terror, anxiety, unrest, fear,
or personal discomfort by that false report, warning, or threat to any person or group of persons, or
prompting an evacuation or lockdown of a location or other law enforcement response, shall be
guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment at the adult correctional institutions for
not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(b) For any person charged under subsection (a) of this section, the court may consider any
factors, including whether the person poses a danger to any individual, the community, or the
defendant, when making bail determinations, and may impose any reasonable conditions or court
order, including, but not limited to:
(1) An extreme risk protection order pursuant to the provisions of chapter 8.3 of title 8;
(2) A no trespass order for any educational, religious, or public institution or building;
(3) A mental health assessment and/or a referral for mental health treatment; and/or

(4) Substance abuse counseling.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001560
========
LC001560 - Page 2 of 3